Maryland, session 2026, HB1583.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That:
EXPLANATION: CAPITALS INDICATE MATTER ADDED TO EXISTING LAW.
[Brackets] indicate matter deleted from exist in g l aw . *hb1583*

HOUSE BILL 1583
(a) The Maryland Insurance Administration shall establish a workgroup to study
how the General Assembly could establish an equitable and sustainable low–cost auto
program or economic relief credit program to reduce the cost of private passenger
automobile insurance for low–income drivers in the State.
(b) The workgroup shall consist of the following members:
(1) one member of the Senate of Maryland who is a member of the Finance
Committee, appointed by the President of the Senate;
(2) one member of the House of Delegates who is a member of the Judiciary
Committee, appointed by the Speaker of the House;
(3) the Maryland Insurance Commissioner, or the Commissioner’s
designee;
(4) the Executive Director of the Maryland Automobile Insurance Fund, or
the Executive Director’s designee; and
(5) the following members, appointed by the chair of the workgroup:
(i) one representative of an automobile insurer or automobile
insurer trade association;
(ii) one representative of a consumer advocacy group that is active
in the area of automobile insurance; and
(iii) one representative of private passenger automobile insurance
producers in the State.
(c) The Maryland Insurance Commissioner, or the Commissioner’s designee,
shall chair the workgroup.
(d) In conducting the study required under subsection (a) of this section, the
workgroup shall consider:
(1) whether the program should be open to income–eligible residents with
good driving records who are able to obtain coverage on the voluntary market or be limited
to high–risk drivers insured through the Maryland Automobile Insurance Fund;
(2) whether and, if so, how coverage types and coverage limits for policies
offered through a low–cost auto program should be constrained to control program costs;
(3) what the eligibility criteria should be to qualify for coverage through a
low–cost auto program, such as having:

HOUSE BILL 1583 3
(i) individual or household income below a certain threshold;
(ii) a good driving record or being a new driver; and
(iii) a vehicle valued below a certain amount;
(4) whether a low–cost auto program should be completely
self–funded via adequate rates and surcharges paid by its policyholders or a supplemental
funding source should be designated;
(5) the appropriate entity to administer a low–cost auto program or
economic relief credit program; and
(6) how an economic relief credit program should be funded.
(e) On or before January 1, 2027, the workgroup shall report its findings and
recommendations to the Governor and, in accordance with § 2–1257 of the State
Government Article, the General Assembly.
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect July
1, 2026. It shall remain effective for a period of 1 year and, at the end of June 30, 2027, this
Act, with no further action required by the General Assembly, shall be abrogated and of no
further force and effect.